Utah statutes.
13-42-125.   Voidable agreements.

(1)  If a provider imposes a fee or other charge or receives money or other payments not authorized by Section 13-42-123 or 13-42-124, the individual may void the agreement and recover as provided in Section 13-42-135.

(2)  If a provider is not registered as required by this chapter when an individual assents to an agreement, the agreement is voidable by the individual.

(3)  If an individual voids an agreement under Subsection (2), the provider does not have a claim against the individual for breach of contract or for restitution.



Enacted by Chapter 154, 2006 General Session

